Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 06.50.600.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For deferred deposit advances, see 3 AAC 11.

Sec. 06.50.610.
Relationship to federal and other state law.

If a provision of this chapter is preempted by or conflicts with federal law in a particular situation, the provision does not apply to the extent of the preemption or conflict.

If a provision of this chapter conflicts with another state law in a particular situation, the provision in this chapter governs to the extent of the conflict.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)